bulgarian.aff
flag *T:
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,-
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈… »
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ã
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ŸŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ŸŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,…
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,…“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂ…
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂ… »
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂ…“≈
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÀ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÀ¿
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÀ»
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÀ»“≈
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÀ»ﬂ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÀŒ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÃ≈
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÕ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÕ¿
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÕ¿“¿
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÕ»
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÕ»“≈
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÕ»ﬂ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÕ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÕŒ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÕŒ“Œ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂ“
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂ“≈
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂ’
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂ’¿
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂ’Ã≈
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂ’“≈
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÿ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂÿ≈
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂŸ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂŸ¿
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂŸ¿“¿
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂŸ»
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂŸ»“≈
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂŸ»ﬂ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂŸ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂŸŒ
    ﬂ Ã      >      -ﬂÃ,ﬂŸŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,“¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,“»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,“»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,“»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,“»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,“Œ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ“

flag *U:
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ¿“
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈… »
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈À»
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈À»“≈
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈Ã
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈Õ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈Õ¿
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈Õ¿“¿
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈Õ»
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈Õ»“≈
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈Õ»ﬂ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈Õ»ﬂ“
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈ÕŒ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈ÕŒ“Œ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈“≈
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈ÿ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ≈ÿ≈
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒ»
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒŒ’
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒŒ’¿
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒŒ’Ã≈
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒŒ’“≈
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂÀ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂÀ¿
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂÀ¿“¿
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂÀ»ﬂ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂÀŒ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂ’
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂ’¿
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂ’Ã≈
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂ’“≈
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂŸ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂŸ¿
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂŸ¿“¿
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂŸ»
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂŸ»“≈
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂŸ»ﬂ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂŸ»ﬂ“
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂŸŒ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ƒﬂŸŒ“Œ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,À
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,À¿
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,À¿“¿
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,À»
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,À»“≈
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,À»ﬂ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,À»ﬂ“
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ÀŒ
    ƒ ¿      >      -ƒ¿,ÀŒ“Œ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,À
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,À¿
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,À¿“¿
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,À»
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,À»“≈
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,À»ﬂ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,À»ﬂ“
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,ÀŒ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,ÀŒ“Œ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“¿“
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈… »
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈À»
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈À»“≈
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈Ã
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈Õ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈Õ¿
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈Õ¿“¿
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈Õ»
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈Õ»“≈
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈Õ»ﬂ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈Õ»ﬂ“
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈ÕŒ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈ÕŒ“Œ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈“≈
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈ÿ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“≈ÿ≈
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“»
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“Œ’
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“Œ’¿
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“Œ’Ã≈
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“Œ’“≈
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂÀ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂÀ¿
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂÀ¿“¿
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂÀ»ﬂ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂÀŒ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂ’
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂ’¿
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂ’Ã≈
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂ’“≈
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂŸ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂŸ¿
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂŸ¿“¿
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂŸ»
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂŸ»“≈
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂŸ»ﬂ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂŸ»ﬂ“
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂŸŒ
    “ ¿      >      -“¿,“ﬂŸŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,-
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈… »
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ã
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ŸŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ŸŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,…
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,…“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,Õ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,Õ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,Õ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,Õ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,Õ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,Õ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,Õ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ÕŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ÕŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ“
